Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 275 Limited Liability Companies
275.350.
Approval of proposed merger — No right of dissent.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, a limited liability company that is a party to a proposed merger shall approve the plan of merger in KRS

275.355

by a majority-in-interest of the members.

Each business entity that is a party to a proposed merger shall approve the plan of merger in the manner and by the vote required by the laws applicable to the business entity.

Each business entity that is a party to the merger shall have the rights to abandon the merger as provided for in the plan of merger or in the laws applicable to the business entity.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, a written operating agreement, or a written agreement and plan of merger, no member of a limited liability company shall have the right to dissent from a merger.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
70, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, §
40, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, §
123, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 123, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Dolson, Contractual Dissenters’ Rights for Kentucky LLCs, Volume 75, No. 1, January 2011, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.355.
Plan of merger.

Each constituent business entity shall enter into a written plan of merger, which shall be approved in accordance with KRS

275.350

.

The plan of merger shall set forth:

The name of each constituent business entity that is a party to the merger and the name of the surviving business entity into which each constituent business entity proposes to merge;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger, including but not limited to, a statement which sets forth whether limited liability is retained by the surviving business entity;

The manner and basis of converting the interests in each limited liability company and the interests in each business entity that is a party to the merger into interests, shares, or other securities or obligations, as the case may be, of the surviving entity, or of any other business entity, or, in whole or in part, into cash or other property;

The amendments to the articles of organization of a limited liability company, or articles of incorporation of a corporation or certificate of limited partnership, as the case may be, of the surviving business entity as are desired to be effected by the merger, or that no changes are desired;

Other provisions relating to the proposed merger that are deemed necessary or desirable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 71, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.360.
Articles of merger.

The business entity surviving from the merger shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of merger duly executed by each constituent business entity setting forth:

The name and jurisdiction of formation or organization of each constituent business entity which is to merge;

The name of the surviving business entity;

The information required by KRS 275.355(2)(d);

Any amendment to the articles of organization of the surviving limited liability company;

A statement that the plan of merger was duly authorized and approved by each constituent business entity in accordance with KRS

275.350

; and

If the surviving entity is not a business entity organized under the laws of this Commonwealth, a statement that the surviving business entity:

Agrees that it may be served with process in this Commonwealth in any proceeding for enforcement of any obligation of any constituent business entity party to the merger that was organized under the laws of this Commonwealth, as well as for enforcement of any obligation of the surviving business entity arising from the merger; and

Appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any such proceeding. The surviving entity shall specify the address to which a copy of the process shall be mailed to it by the Secretary of State.

A merger shall take effect upon the later of the effective date of the filing of the articles of merger or the date set forth in the articles of merger.

The articles of merger shall be executed by a limited liability company that is a party to the merger in the manner provided for in KRS

14A.2-020

and shall be filed with the Secretary of State in the manner provided for in KRS

14A.2-010

.

A plan of merger approved in accordance with KRS

275.350

may effect any amendment to an operating agreement for a limited liability company if it is the surviving company in the merger. An approved plan of merger may also provide that the operating agreement of any constituent limited liability company to the merger, including a limited liability company formed for the purpose of consummating a merger, shall be the operating agreement of the limited liability company that is the surviving business entity. Any amendment to an operating agreement or adoption of a new operating agreement made pursuant to this subsection shall be effective at the effective time and date of the merger. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the accomplishment of a merger or of any of the matters referred to in this section by any other means provided for in an operating agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 72, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 133, § 41, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 126, effective January 1, 2011; 2015 ch. 34, § 56, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 133 and 151, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.365.
Effect of merger.

A merger shall have the following effects:

The constituent business entities that are parties to the merger shall be a single entity, which shall be the entity designated in the plan of merger as the surviving business entity.

Each party to the merger, except the surviving business entity, shall cease to exist.

The surviving business entity shall possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers of each constituent business entity and shall be subject to all the restrictions, disabilities, and duties of each of the constituent entities to the extent the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, restrictions, disabilities, and duties are applicable to the type of business entity that is the surviving business entity.

All property, whether real, personal, or intangible, and all debts due on whatever account, including promises to make capital contributions and subscriptions for shares, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest of, belonging to, or due to each of the constituent business entities shall be vested in the surviving business entity without further act or deed.

The title to all real estate and any interest therein, vested in any constituent business entity shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the merger.

The surviving entity shall thenceforth be liable for all liabilities and obligations of each of the constituent business entities merged, and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent business entity may be prosecuted as if the merger had not taken place, or the surviving business entity may be substituted in the action.

Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens on the property of any constituent business entity shall be impaired by the merger.

The interests in a limited liability company or other business entities that are to be converted or exchanged into interests, other securities, cash, obligations, or other property under the terms of the plan of merger are so converted and the former holders thereof are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of merger or the rights otherwise provided by law.

A partner or, in the case of a limited partnership, a general partner who becomes a member of a limited liability company as a result of a merger, as the case may be, shall remain liable as a partner or general partner for an obligation incurred by the partnership or limited partnership before the merger takes effect. The partner’s or general partner’s liability for all other obligations of the limited liability company incurred after the merger takes effect shall be that of a member as provided in this chapter. A limited partner who becomes a member as a result of a merger shall remain liable only as a limited partner for an obligation incurred by the limited partnership before the merger takes effect.

If the surviving business entity is a limited liability company, such amendments to the articles of organization set forth in the articles of merger, and such amendments to the operating agreement thereof set forth in the plan of merger or the articles of merger, subject to KRS

275.200

, shall be effective.

If the surviving business entity is a limited liability company, the written operating agreement provided for in the plan of merger, if any, shall be binding upon each member in that limited liability company, but any provision thereof obligating a member to make a contribution to the limited liability company is subject to KRS

275.200

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 73, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 341, § 41, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 133, § 42, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 113, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 57, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge & Honabach, Kentucky Business Entity Laws: The 2010 Amendments, Vol. 74, No. 5, September 2010, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.370.
Conversion of partnership or limited partnership to limited liability company.

A partnership or limited partnership may be converted to a limited liability company pursuant to this section.

The terms and conditions of a conversion of a partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company shall, in the case of a partnership, be approved by all the partners or by a number or percentage specified for conversion in the partnership agreement or, in the case of a limited partnership, by all the partners, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the limited partnership agreement.

After the conversion is approved under subsection (2) of this section, the partnership or limited partnership shall file articles of organization with the office of the Secretary of State which satisfy the requirements of KRS

275.025

and include:

A statement that the partnership or limited partnership was converted to a limited liability company from a partnership or limited partnership, as the case may be;

Its former name;

In the case of a partnership, a statement of the number of votes cast by the partners entitled to vote for and against the conversion and, if the vote is less than unanimous, the number or percentage required to approve the conversion under the partnership agreement; and

If the converting partnership has filed a statement of registration as a limited liability partnership in accordance with KRS

362.555

, a statement of qualification in accordance with KRS

362.1-931

, or a statement of partnership authority, each shall be deemed canceled as of the effective date and time of the articles of organization as determined in accordance with KRS

275.020

; and

In the case of a limited partnership, the converting limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership shall be deemed canceled as of the effective date and time of the articles of organization as determined in accordance with KRS

275.020

.

The conversion shall take effect when the articles of organization are filed with the office of the Secretary of State or, as provided in KRS

275.020

, at a later date specified in the articles of organization.

A partner or, in the case of a limited partnership, a general partner who becomes a member of a limited liability company as a result of a conversion shall remain liable as a partner or general partner for an obligation incurred by the partnership or limited partnership before the conversion takes effect. If the other party to a transaction with the limited liability company reasonably believes when entering the transaction that the member undertaking the transaction is a partner in a partnership or a general partner in a limited partnership, the member shall be liable for an obligation incurred by the limited liability company within ninety (90) days after the conversion takes effect. The partner’s or general partner’s liability for all other obligations of the limited liability company incurred after the conversion takes effect shall be that of a member as provided in this chapter. A limited partner who becomes a member as a result of a conversion shall remain liable only as a limited partner for an obligation incurred by the limited partnership before the conversion takes effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 74, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, § 124, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
124, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 43, effective July 15, 2010.

275.372.
Conversion of limited liability company into limited partnership.

A limited liability company may convert into a limited partnership as provided in KRS

362.2-952

(4).

A limited liability company may convert into a limited liability partnership as provided in KRS

362.1-903

.

A limited liability company may convert into a limited liability partnership as provided in KRS

362.1-903

.

The terms and conditions of the conversion of a limited liability company shall be approved by all of the members notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the operating agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 149, § 196, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, § 18, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
18, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 114, effective July 12, 2012.

275.375.
Effect of conversion.

A partnership or limited partnership that has been converted pursuant to this chapter shall be for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

When a conversion takes effect:

All property and contract rights owned by, and all rights, privileges, and immunities of the converting partnership or limited partnership shall remain vested in the converted limited liability company without assignment, reversion, or impairment;

All obligations of the converting partnership or limited partnership shall continue as obligations of the converted limited liability company;

An action or proceeding pending against the converting partnership or limited partnership may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred and the name of the converted limited liability company may be substituted in any pending action or proceeding for the name of the converting partnership or limited partnership; and

The written operating agreement of the converted limited liability company shall be binding upon each person who becomes a member of the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
75, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
125, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
125, effective July 15, 2010.

275.376.
Conversion of corporation or foreign corporation to limited liability company.

A corporation may be converted to a limited liability company pursuant to this section.

The terms and conditions of the conversion of a corporation to a limited liability company shall be set forth in a written plan of conversion and approved by the board of directors and by the shareholders of the corporation.

The plan of conversion shall set forth:

The name of the corporation planning to convert;

The terms and conditions of the conversion, including the articles of organization and the written operating agreement, if any, of the limited liability company into which the corporation will convert; and

The manner and basis of converting the shares of the corporation into membership interests, obligations, or other securities of the limited liability company or into cash or other property in whole or part.

The plan of conversion may set forth any other provision relating to the conversion.

For a plan of conversion to be approved:

The board of directors shall recommend the plan of conversion to the shareholders, unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with a plan; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the plan.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed conversion on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders’ meeting in accordance with KRS

271B.7-050

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of conversion and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan.

Unless KRS Chapter 271B, the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, require a greater vote or vote by voting groups, the plan of conversion to be authorized shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group.

Separate voting by voting groups shall be required on a plan of conversion if the plan contains a provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation, would require action by one (1) or more separate voting groups on the proposed amendment under KRS

271B.10-040

.

After a conversion is authorized, and at any time before articles of organization are filed, the planned conversion may be abandoned subject to any contractual rights, without further shareholder action, in accordance with the procedure set forth in the plan of conversion or, if none is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

After the conversion is approved, the corporation shall file articles of organization with the office of the Secretary of State that satisfy the requirements of KRS

275.025

and also include:

A statement that the corporation was converted to a limited liability company;

Its former name; and

The designation, number of outstanding shares, and number of votes to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan of conversion and either the total number of undisputed votes cast for the plan separately by each voting group or a statement that the number cast for the plan by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

The conversion shall take effect when the articles of organization are filed with the office of the Secretary of State or, subject to KRS

14A.2-070

, at a later date specified in the articles of organization.

Both a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of the Commonwealth and a foreign nonprofit corporation, if not forbidden by the laws of its jurisdiction of organization, may convert into a nonprofit limited liability company, except that the only member or members of the converted nonprofit limited liability company shall be organizations qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. The articles of organization filed to effect this conversion, in addition to the otherwise applicable requirements, shall contain an affirmative statement that the only member or members of the converted nonprofit limited liability company are qualified under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
16, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
16, effective July 15; 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 44, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 151, § 143, effective January 1, 2011; 2015 ch. 34, § 47, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 133 and 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendments, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in this section pursuant to the authority of KRS

7.136

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.377.
Effect of conversion of corporation to limited liability company.

A limited liability company that has been converted pursuant to this chapter shall be for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

When a conversion takes effect:

All property and contract rights owned by, and all rights, privileges, and immunities of the converting corporation shall remain vested in the converted limited liability company without assignment, reversion, or impairment;

All obligations of the converting corporation shall continue as obligations of the converted limited liability company;

An action or proceeding pending against the converting corporation may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred, and the name of the converted limited liability company may be substituted in any pending action or proceeding for the name of the converting corporation; and

The written operating agreement of the converted limited liability company shall be binding upon each person who becomes a member of the limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
17, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
17, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 18, effective June 8, 2011.

275.380.
Laws governing foreign limited liability company.

Subject to the Constitution of this Commonwealth:

The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability company is organized shall govern its organization and internal affairs, including the inspection of the books, records, and documents, and the liability of its members, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section; and

A foreign limited liability company shall not be denied registration by reason of any difference between the laws of another jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability company is organized and the laws of this Commonwealth.

A certificate of authority obtained pursuant to this chapter shall not authorize a foreign limited liability company to exercise any powers or engage in any business that a domestic limited liability company is forbidden to exercise or engage in by the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
76, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 137, §
126, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
126, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.385.
Transaction of business by foreign limited liability company.

Each limited liability company and each foreign limited liability company qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, §
77, effective July 15, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
79, effective January 1, 2011.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

MacDonald and Seiffert, The Kentucky Limited Liability Company Act: An Analysis Of Applications In Its Second Year, Vol. 60, No. 1, Winter 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 20.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.390.
Certificate of authority required of foreign limited liability company for access to courts — Civil penalty for violation. [Repealed.]

275.395.
Application for certificate of authority for foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.400.
Amended certificate of authority for foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.405.
Effect of certificate of authority for foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.410.
Name used by foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.415.
Registered office and registered agent for foreign limited liability company.

Each foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who may be:

An individual who resides in this Commonwealth and whose business office is identical with the registered office;

A domestic corporation or not-for-profit domestic corporation whose business office is identical with the registered office;

A foreign corporation or foreign not-for-profit corporation authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth whose business address is identical with the registered office.

The registered agent shall execute and deliver to the Secretary of State a document accepting the agency appointment, and the appointment of the agent shall not be effective until delivered to the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 83, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

275.420.
Change of registered office or registered agent for foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.425.
Statement of resignation of registered agent of foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.430.
Service of process on foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.435.
Certificate of withdrawal for foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.440.
Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority of foreign limited liability company. [Repealed.]

275.445.
Notice of determination — Revocation of certificate — Effect of revocation. [Repealed.]

275.450.
Appeal of revocation. [Repealed.]

275.454.
Venue.

Any action brought by the Attorney General for the involuntary dissolution of a nonprofit limited liability company may be commenced in Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court of the county in which the registered office of the nonprofit limited liability company is situated.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
14, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
14, effective July 15, 2010.

275.455.
Exercise of powers by Kentucky company in any state or country.

A limited liability company organized and existing under this chapter may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and have and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state or foreign country.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 91, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

275.500.
Share exchange between corporation and limited liability company.

A limited liability company may acquire all or part of the outstanding shares of one (1) or more classes or series of a domestic or foreign corporation if the corporation, limited liability company, and a majority of their owners approve the exchange and, if the corporation is a foreign corporation, the share exchange is permitted under the laws of the state or country under which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

The plan of share exchange shall set forth:

The name of the corporation whose shares will be acquired and the name of the acquiring limited liability company;

The terms and conditions of the exchange; and

The manner and basis of exchanging the shares to be acquired for limited liability company interests, obligations, or other securities of the acquiring limited liability company or for cash or other property, in whole or part.

The plan of share exchange may set forth other provisions relating to the exchange.

This section shall not limit the power of a limited liability company to acquire all or part of the shares of one (1) or more classes or series of a corporation through a voluntary exchange or otherwise.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization, a written operating agreement, or a written plan of share exchange, no member of a limited liability company shall have the right to dissent from a share exchange.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
5, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
5, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.505.
Approval of plan of share exchange.

Unless otherwise provided in a written operating agreement, the plan of share exchange described in KRS

275.500

shall be considered for adoption by the members of the limited liability company.

Each business entity that is a party to the share exchange shall approve the plan of share exchange in the manner and by the vote required by the laws applicable to the business entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
6, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
6, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.510.
Articles of share exchange.

After a plan of share exchange has been approved in accordance with KRS

275.505

, the acquiring limited liability company shall deliver to the Secretary of State, for filing, the articles of share exchange setting forth:

The plan of share exchange; and

A statement that the plan of share exchange was duly authorized and approved by each of the constituent business entities in accordance with the laws applicable to each business entity.

A share exchange shall take effect upon the effective date of the articles of share exchange.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
7, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
7, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.515.
Effect of share exchange.

When a share exchange takes effect, the shares of each acquired corporation shall be exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of the shares shall be entitled only to the exchange rights provided in the articles of share exchange.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
8, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
8, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.520.
Issuance of membership interests and distributions by nonprofit limited liability company prohibited — Exception for some business entities.

Unless a nonprofit limited liability company has only business entities formed for a nonprofit purpose as its members, a nonprofit limited liability company shall not have or issue membership interests in the limited liability company, and no distribution shall be paid, and no part of the income or profit of the limited liability company shall be distributed to its members or managers.

No part of the income or profit of a nonprofit limited liability company shall be distributed to its manager or managers.

A nonprofit limited liability company may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members or managers for services rendered and may confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes, and these payments or benefits shall not be deemed to be a distribution of income or profit.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
9, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
9, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 48, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.525.
Loans to members and managers by nonprofit limited liability company prohibited — Exception for some business entities.

Unless a nonprofit limited liability company has only business entities formed for a nonprofit purpose as its members, no loan shall be made by the company to its members or managers, and any member or manager who assents to or participates in the making of a loan violating this prohibition shall be liable to the company for the amount of the loan until its repayment.

No loan shall be made by a nonprofit limited liability company to its managers, and any member or manager who assents to or participates in the making of a loan violating this prohibition shall be liable to the company for the amount of the loan until its repayment.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
10, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
10, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 49, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

275.530.
Distribution of assets of nonprofit limited liability company.

The assets of a nonprofit limited liability company in the process of dissolution shall be applied and distributed as follows:

All liabilities and obligations of the nonprofit limited liability company shall be paid and discharged or adequate provisions made for them;

Assets received and held by the nonprofit limited liability company upon condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with the condition’s requirements;

Assets received and held by the nonprofit limited liability company subject to limitations permitting their use only for a nonprofit purpose, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance by reason of the dissolution, shall be transferred or conveyed to one (1) or more domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations, limited liability companies, societies, or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving nonprofit limited liability company, pursuant to a plan of distribution; and

Any remaining assets may be distributed to those nonprofit corporations, limited liability companies, societies, or organizations as may be specified in a plan of dissolution, including those that are members of the nonprofit limited liability companies.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
11, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
11, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).